Virginia statutes. Title 27. Fire Protection.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 27-55.
Department of State Police or successor agency to keep record of fires and explosions; when open to public inspection.

The Department of State Police or its successor agency shall keep in its office a record of all fires occurring in the Commonwealth, investigation of which is provided for in this article, together with all facts, statistics and circumstances concerning the same, including the origin of the fires. Such records shall not be open to public inspection, except insofar as the Department shall permit otherwise. Whenever the word “Department” appears in this article it shall be deemed to mean the Department of State Police or its successor agency in the Office of Public Safety.

History.

Code 1919, § 4148; 1918, p. 123; 1936, p. 259; 1948, p. 487; 1977, c. 613.

§ 27-56.
Department to examine into origin of fires; appointment of arson investigators.

The Department shall examine, or cause examination to be made, into the origin and circumstances of all fires occurring in this Commonwealth, which may be brought to its attention by official report, or otherwise, and for that purpose shall have authority to call for and demand of the chief or other head officer of the fire department, and the chief or other head officer of the police department, of any city or town, and the sheriff of any county, for any information or assistance it may require in making or furthering such examination.

The Department shall appoint a chief arson investigator and assistant arson investigators, who shall have the same police powers as a sheriff in the investigation and prosecution of all offenses involving fires, fire bombings, bombings, attempts, threats to commit such offense, false alarms relating to any such offense, possession and manufacture of explosive devices, substances and firebombs.

History.

Code 1919, § 4186; 1977, c. 613.

Cross references.

As to the transfer of the office of the Chief Arson Investigator as a division to the Department of State Police, see Editor’s note to §

36-131

.

Law Review.

For note, “Arson Investigations and the Fourth Amendment,” see 30 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 133 (1973).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8B M.J. Fires, § 2; 16 M.J. Searches and Seizures, § 8.

§ 27-57.
When insurance company to pay expenses of examination.

When such examination is made on the application of any fire insurance company, the necessary expenses attending the same shall be paid by such company.

History.

Code 1919, § 4186.

§ 27-58.
Right to examine buildings or premises.

The Department, and such person or persons as it may appoint, shall have authority at all times of the day, in the performance of the duties imposed by the provisions of §

27-56

, to enter upon and examine any building or premises where any fire has occurred, and any other buildings or premises immediately adjoining the same; provided, that such adjoining building is not at the time occupied and used as a dwelling house.

History.

Code 1919, § 4187; 1977, c. 613.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on criminal law for the year 1971-72, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1206 (1972).

For note, “Arson Investigations and the Fourth Amendment,” see 30 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 133 (1973).

For note, “Criminal Procedure and Criminal Law: Virginia Supreme Court Decisions During the 70’s,” see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 585 (1981).

§ 27-59.
Criminal prosecutions.

If the Department shall be of opinion, after investigation as to the cause or origin of any fire, that there is sufficient evidence to charge any person with the crime of arson, or with incendiary burning of property, it shall furnish to the attorney for the Commonwealth of the city or county all such evidence, together with the names of witnesses, and all information obtained by it, including a copy of all pertinent and material testimony taken by it touching such offense.

History.

Code 1919, § 4188; 1918, p. 123; 1977, c. 613.

Law Review.

For note, “Arson Investigations and the Fourth Amendment,” see 30 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 133 (1973).

§ 27-60.
Department to conduct investigations in certain cases; investigations may be private.

The Department may petition an appropriate judicial officer to summons and compel the attendance of witnesses to testify in relation to any matter which is, by the provisions of this chapter, a subject of inquiry and investigation. It may also administer oaths and affirmations to such witnesses, and false swearing in any such matter shall be deemed perjury, and shall be punished as such. It may in its discretion take or cause to be taken the testimony on oath of all persons supposed to be cognizant of any facts or to have means of knowledge in relation to the matters as to which any examination is, in this chapter, required to be made, and shall cause the same to be reduced to writing. Investigations in relation to such matters may, in the discretion of the Department, be private, and persons other than those required to be present by the provisions of this chapter may be excluded from that place where such examination is held, and witnesses may be kept separate and apart from each other, and not allowed to communicate with each other until they have been examined.

History.

Code 1919, § 4189; 1977, c. 613.

§ 27-61.
When Department or fire chief may remedy inflammable or unsafe conditions.

The Department of Fire Programs, by its representative, or the chief or other head of the fire department of any county, city or town or district thereof, shall have the right, at all reasonable hours, for the purpose of examination, to enter into and upon any public school building or any other building or premises not at the time occupied and used as a dwelling house, within their respective jurisdictions, for examination as to combustible materials or inflammable or unsafe conditions in any such building or upon any such premises. Upon complaint of any person having an interest in any building or premises or property adjacent thereto, in his jurisdiction, an officer shall make an immediate investigation as to the presence of any combustible materials or the existence of inflammable or unsafe conditions in such buildings or upon such premises. Whenever any officer finds in any building or upon any premises combustible, inflammable or unsafe conditions, dangerous to the safety of the building or premises, or other property, he shall order the same to be removed or remedied, and the order shall, within a reasonable time to be fixed in the order, be complied with by the owner or occupant of the building or premises.

Any owner or occupant aggrieved by such order may within five days after notice of such order, appeal to the Department of Fire Programs, and the cause of his complaint shall be at once investigated by the Executive Director of the Department of Fire Programs, and unless by its authority such order is revoked, the order shall remain in force and the owner or occupant shall comply with the order.

Any owner or occupant of any building or premises failing to comply with any final order made or given under the authority of this section, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and punished by a fine of not less than $5 nor more than $100 for each offense.

History.

Code 1919, § 4190; 1936, p. 776; 1977, c. 613; 1988, c. 199; 2007, cc. 647, 741.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, cc. 647 and 741, cl. 3, provide: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2008.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 647 and 741, effective July 1, 2008, are identical, and substituted “Fire Programs” for “Housing and Community Development” near the beginning of the first paragraph; and substituted “Fire Programs” for “Housing and Community Development” twice and inserted “Executive” preceding “Director of the Department” in the second paragraph.

§ 27-62.
Penalty on local officers for violating law.

Any city, town or county officer referred to in this article who willfully neglects or refuses to comply with any of the requirements of this article shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of not less than $5, nor more than $100.

History.

Code 1919, § 4192.